Florida, session 2026, HB717.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (5) of section 393.063, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
393.063 Definitions.—For the purposes of this chapter, the
term:
(5) "Autism" and "autism spectrum disorder" mean means a
condition as defined by the most recent edition of the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders of the
American Psychiatric Association pervasive, neurologically based
developmental disability of extended duration which causes
severe learning, communication, and behavior disorders with age
of onset during infancy or childhood. Individuals with autism
exhibit impairment in reciprocal social interaction, impairment
in verbal and nonverbal communication and imaginative ability,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb717-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 717 2026
and a markedly restricted repertoire of activities and
interests.
Section 2. Subsection (4) of section 1012.582, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
1012.582 Continuing education and inservice training for
teaching students with developmental and emotional or behavioral
disabilities.—
(4)(a) The State Board of Education shall may adopt rules
pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this section.
(b) Such rules must require a K-12 teacher who teaches a
class with at least 50 percent of students having autism
spectrum disorder to hold an Autism Spectrum Disorder
Endorsement.
(c) Such rules must allow for an exception to the Autism
Spectrum Disorder Endorsement requirement in paragraph (b) if a
teacher holds an Endorsement in Severe or Profound Disabilities,
has taught students with autism spectrum disorder for a minimum
of 3 years, and has been rated as highly effective in the
preceding 3-year period pursuant to s. 1012.34.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb717-00